Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.13.070

City manager—Bond and oath.

Before entering upon the duties of his or her office the city manager shall take an oath or affirmation for the faithful performance of his or her duties and shall execute and file with the clerk of the council a bond in favor of the code city in such sum as may be fixed by the council. The premium on such bond shall be paid by the city.

[ 2009 c 549 s 3024; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.13.070.]